Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. General Regulations and Classifications.

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements for motor vehicles, see 18 AAC 52.

Sec. 46.14.010.
Emission control regulations.

After public hearing, the department may adopt regulations under this chapter establishing ambient air quality standards, emission standards, or exemptions to implement a state air quality control program required under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act), as amended, and regulations adopted under those sections. The standards established under this section may be for the state as a whole or may vary in recognition of local conditions.

Unless the governor has determined that an emergency exists that requires emergency regulations under AS

44.62.250

, the department may adopt the following types of regulations only after the procedures established in (a), (c), and (d) of this section and compliance with AS

46.14.015

:

a regulation that establishes an ambient air quality standard for an air pollutant for which there is no corresponding federal standard;

a regulation that establishes an ambient air quality standard or emission standard that is more stringent than a corresponding federal standard;

a regulation that establishes an equivalent emission limitation for a hazardous air pollutant for which the federal administrator has not adopted a corresponding maximum achievable control technology standard; or

a regulation that regulates emissions from an emissions unit or stationary source or establishes an emission standard under the authority of AS

46.14.120(e)

or

46.14.130(c)(2)

.

In preparation for peer review under AS

46.14.015

and before adopting a regulation described under (b) of this section, the department shall

find in writing that exposure profiles and either meteorological conditions or emissions unit characteristics in the state or in an area of the state reasonably require the ambient air quality standard, or emission standard to protect human health and welfare or the environment; this paragraph does not apply to a regulation under (b)(3) of this section;

find in writing that the proposed standard or emission limitation is technologically feasible; and

prepare a written analysis of the economic feasibility of the proposal.

Before adopting a regulation described in (b)(2) of this section, the department shall find in writing that exposure profiles and either meteorological conditions or emissions unit characteristics are significantly different in the state or in an area of the state from those upon which the corresponding federal regulation is based.

When incorporated into more than one permit, emission standards and limitations, emissions monitoring and reporting requirements, and compliance verification requirements that are generally applicable statewide or are generally applicable to individual emissions unit or stationary source types shall be adopted in regulation unless they have been requested by the owner and operator to whom the permit is issued. The department shall, by regulation, adopt a standard, limitation, or requirement described in this subsection as soon as its general applicability is reasonably foreseeable.

An emission standard adopted by the department may be applicable to individual emissions units within a stationary source or to all emissions units within a stationary source. For purposes of determining compliance with applicable regulations and with permit limitations, the department may allow numerical averaging of the emissions of each air pollutant from several emissions units within a stationary source if

requested by the owner and operator; and

allowed under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act), as amended, and regulations adopted under those sections.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 46 SLA 2003; am §§ 63 — 67 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 46.14.015.
Special procedure for more stringent regulations.

Before the department adopts a regulation described under AS

46.14.010(b)

, written findings under AS

46.14.010(c)

and (d) shall be made available by the department to the public at locations throughout the state that the department considers appropriate.

Before the department adopts a regulation described in AS

46.14.010(b)

, the department shall submit the findings described under (a) of this section, the studies on which the findings are based, and other related data for peer review to a minimum of three separate parties who are not employees of the department and who are determined by the commissioner to be technically qualified in the subject matter under review. The commissioner shall ensure that the peer review includes an analysis of the factors considered by the commissioner to support the standards proposed to be adopted and recommendations, if any, for additional research or investigation considered appropriate. Peer review reports shall be submitted to the commissioner within 45 days after the department submits a matter for peer review unless the commissioner determines that additional time is required.

The department shall make available to the public at least 30 days before the public hearing required under AS

46.14.010(a)

, at convenient locations, copies of the department’s proposed regulation, the findings of the department describing the basis for adoption of the regulation, and the peer review reports, submitted under (b) of this section.

The department shall contract with persons to perform peer review under (b) of this section. All persons selected shall be selected on the basis of competitive sealed proposals under AS

36.30.200

—

36.30.270

(State Procurement Code). The commissioner may not contract with a person to perform peer review under this section if the person has a significant financial interest or other significant interest that could bias evaluation of the proposed regulation. An interest is not considered significant under this subsection if it is an interest possessed generally by the public or a large class of persons or if the effect of the interest on the person’s ability to be impartial is only conjectural.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.020.
Classification of stationary sources or emissions units; reporting.

The department, by regulation, may classify stationary sources or emissions units that, in the department’s determination, are likely to cause or contribute to air pollution, according to the levels and types of emissions and other characteristics that relate to air quality. The department may make a classification under this subsection applicable to the state as a whole or to a designated area of the state. The department shall base the classifications on consideration of health, economic, and social factors, sensitivity of the receiving environment, and physical effects on property.

The department or a local air quality control program authorized under AS

46.14.400

may require an owner and operator of a stationary source or emissions unit classified under this section to report information to the department or the authorized local program concerning location, size, and height of stacks or area emissions units, processes employed, fuels used, the nature and time periods or duration of emissions, and other information relevant to air quality that is available or reasonably capable of being calculated and compiled.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 8 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 68 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

Sec. 46.14.030.
State air quality plan.

The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the state air quality control plan developed under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act), as amended. The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement the state plan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For conformity, see 18 AAC 50, art. 7.

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 4.

For certified station requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 5.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.